Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 194A Cabinet for Health and Family Services
194A.103.
Division of Health Information created in the Office of Health Data and Analytics — Division to provide leadership in the redesign of the health care delivery system — Administrative regulations.

The Division of Health Information is hereby created in the Office of Health Data and Analytics. The division shall provide leadership in the redesign of the health care delivery system using electronic information technology as a means to improve patient care and reduce medical errors and duplicative services.

The Office of Health Data and Analytics shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
2019 ch. 90, § 5, effective June 27, 2019.

194A.105.
Division of Telehealth Services created in the Office of Health Data and Analytics — Duties and responsibilities concerning delivery of care using telehealth.

There is hereby created a Division of Telehealth Services within the Office of Health Data and Analytics to be headed by a director appointed by the secretary pursuant to KRS 12.050. The division shall:

Provide guidance and direction to healthcare providers delivering care using telehealth;

Develop guidance, resources, and education to help promote access to healthcare services in the Commonwealth;

Assist the Cabinet for Health and Family Services with the implementation of KRS 211.334; and

Provide the Department for Medicaid Services with any additional information deemed relevant by the division for inclusion in the report required by KRS 211.334(3).

HISTORY:
2020 ch. 9, § 3, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 67, § 5, effective June 29, 2021.

194A.110.
Advisory Council for Medical Assistance attached for administrative and support purposes.

The Advisory Council for Medical Assistance, established by KRS 205.540, and its associated bodies are attached to the Department for Medicaid Services for administrative and support purposes. The Advisory Council for Medical Assistance shall advise the secretary for health and family services and the commissioner for Medicaid services on the administration and operation of the Medical Assistance Program.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 155, effective June 20, 2005.

194A.115.
Statewide Independent Living Council.

The Statewide Independent Living Council is hereby created and attached to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services in accordance with 42 U.S.C. sec. 3515e for administrative purposes to accomplish the purposes enumerated in 29 U.S.C. sec. 796d (Title VII, Part A, Section 705 of the Rehabilitation Act Amendments of 1998). Members of the council shall be appointed by the Governor from recommendations submitted by the Department for Aging and Independent Living consistent with the federal mandate to include a majority of individuals with disabilities representing geographical and disability diversity, as well as representatives from identified service providers and other entities. The composition, qualifications, and terms of service of the council shall conform to the federal law.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, any vacancy occurring in the membership of the Statewide Independent Living Council shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. The vacancy shall not affect the power of the remaining members of the council.
(2) (a)

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, any vacancy occurring in the membership of the Statewide Independent Living Council shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. The vacancy shall not affect the power of the remaining members of the council.

The Governor may delegate the authority to fill a vacancy to the remaining voting members of the council.

Each member of the Statewide Independent Living Council may receive a per diem of one hundred dollars ($100), not to exceed six hundred dollars ($600) annually, for each regular or special meeting attended if the member is not employed or must forfeit wages from other employment. Each member may have travel expenses approved at the established state rate and expenses reimbursed at the established state agency rate for services such as personal assistance, child care, and drivers for attendance at council meetings, and in the performance of duties authorized by the Statewide Independent Living Council. The per diem and expenses shall be paid out of the federal funds appropriated under 29 U.S.C. ch. 16.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 469, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 211, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 211, § 50, effective July 12, 2006; repealed, reenacted, renumbered, and amended, 2016, ch. 32, § 2, effective July 15, 2016.

194A.120.
Bodies attached to cabinet with statutory authority to issue administrative regulations.

The Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs and the State Interagency Council for Services and Support to Children and Transition-Age Youth shall be the only statutory bodies attached to the cabinet that shall have the authority to issue administrative regulations. No other corporate body or instrumentality of the Commonwealth, advisory committee, interstate compact, or other statutory body, presently attached to the cabinet, shall issue administrative regulations but shall operate only in an advisory capacity.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 12, effective July 15, 1998; 2018 ch. 120, § 8, effective July 14, 2018.

194A.125.
Telehealth Board — Members — Chair — Scope of administrative regulations — Board to make recommendations following consultation with Governor’s office — Universities of Kentucky and Louisville to report to General Assembly — Receipt and dispensing of funds. [Repealed]

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend. 2007, ch. 24, § 25, effective June 26, 2007; 2012, ch. 158, § 16, effective July 12, 2012; repealed by 2018 ch. 187, § 10, effective July 1, 2019.

194A.130.
Limitation on administrative processes.

No corporate body or instrumentality of the Commonwealth, advisory committee, interstate compact, or other statutory body, attached to or within the cabinet, shall expend funds, hire employees, issue grants, or otherwise engage in the normal administrative process of the cabinet. All of these bodies shall be provided administrative and support services by the cabinet.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 13, effective July 15, 1998.

194A.135.
Commonwealth Council on Developmental Disabilities — Members — Executive Director — Duties. [Renumbered]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 14, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 20, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 99, § 156, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 138, § 3, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 211, § 118, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 24, § 5, effective June 26, 2007; 2012, ch. 146, § 22, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 158, § 17, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 18, § 3, effective July 15, 2016; renumbered to § 41.410 by 2018 ch. 95 § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

194A.140.
Special subcommittees of the Public Health Services Advisory Council or of the Institute for Aging. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 15, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 6, § 9, effective July 14, 2000; repealed by 2020 ch. 36, § 44, effective July 15, 2020.